New York, session 2025-2026, S2369.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of section 5-211 of the election law, 2 as amended by section 7 of part PP of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 Each agency designated as a participating agency under the provisions 5 of this section shall implement and administer a program of distribution 6 of voter registration forms pursuant to the provisions of this section. 7 The following offices which provide public assistance and/or provide 8 state funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons 9 with disabilities are hereby designated as voter registration agencies: 10 designated as the state agencies which provide public assistance are the 11 office of children and family services, the office of temporary and 12 disability assistance and the department of health. Also designated as 13 public assistance agencies are all agencies of local government that 14 provide such assistance. Designated as state agencies that provide 15 programs primarily engaged in providing services to people with disabil- 16 ities are the department of labor, office for the aging, department of 17 veterans' services, office of mental health, office of vocational and 18 educational services for individuals with disabilities, commission on 19 quality of care for the mentally disabled, office for people with devel- 20 opmental disabilities, commission for the blind, office of addiction 21 services and supports, the office of the advocate for the disabled and 22 all offices which administer programs established or funded by such 23 agencies. Additional participating agencies designated as voter regis- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02554-01-5 S. 2369 2 1 tration offices are the department of state and the district offices of 2 the workers' compensation board and every court and law enforcement 3 agency when such entities are issuing licenses to carry, possess, repair 4 or dispose of firearms. Such agencies shall be required to offer voter 5 registration forms to persons upon initial application for services, 6 upon renewal or recertification for services, participation in activ- 7 ities or use of facilities of the agency, and upon change of address 8 relating to such services. Such agencies shall also be responsible for 9 providing assistance to applicants in completing voter registration 10 forms, receiving and transmitting the completed application form from 11 all applicants who wish to have such form transmitted to the appropriate 12 board of elections. The state board of elections shall, together with 13 representatives of the United States department of defense, develop and 14 implement procedures for including recruitment offices of the armed 15 forces of the United States as voter registration offices when such 16 offices are so designated by federal law. The state board of elections 17 shall also make request of the United States Citizenship and Immigration 18 Services to include applications for registration by mail with any mate- 19 rials which are given to new citizens. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 21 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 22 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 23 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made on or 24 before such date.